Tennessee, session 114, SB0876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-105, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(c)
(1) Each county clerk shall provide a mail order service for the renewal of
registrations whereby registrants may apply for and receive the renewal
certificates and plates or decals through the United States postal service. Except
as otherwise required by law, an application for renewal by mail must be
postmarked not later than twenty (20) days before the license expiration date to
allow time for processing.
(2) Each county clerk may impose a fee for service of handling mail
orders of plates and decals. The fee for the service of handling mail orders of
plates is seven dollars ($7.00), and the fee for the service of handling mail orders
of decals is three dollars ($3.00).
(3) Each county clerk is authorized to increase the fees provided in
subdivision (c)(2) in an amount not to exceed any applicable United States postal
service price increase in any given year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0876
002581
- 1 -